en: common octopus, Octopus vulgaris
af: Gewone seekat, Octopus vulgaris
ar: أخطبوط شائع, Octopus vulgaris
bg: обикновен октопод, Octopus vulgaris
ca: pop roquer, Octopus vulgaris
cs: chobotnice pobřežní, Octopus vulgaris
da: Ottearmet blæksprutte, Octopus vulgaris
de: Gewöhnlicher Krake, Octopus vulgaris
es: Pulpo común, Octopus vulgaris
et: Harilik kaheksajalg, Octopus vulgaris
eu: Olagarro arrunt, Octopus vulgaris
fa: هشت‌پای معمولی, Octopus vulgaris
fi: Meritursas, Octopus vulgaris
fr: poulpe commun, Pieuvre commune, Octopus vulgaris
ga: Ochtapas coiteann, Octopus vulgaris
gl: Polbo común, Octopus vulgaris
he: תמנון החוף, Octopus vulgaris
hr: obična hobotnica, Octopus vulgaris
hu: Közönséges polip, Octopus vulgaris
it: Polpo comune, Octopus vulgaris
ja: マダコ, Octopus vulgaris
ka: რვაფეხა, Octopus vulgaris
ko: 참문어, Octopus vulgaris
la: Octopus vulgaris
lb: Gewéinlechen Tëntefësch, Octopus vulgaris
lt: Paprastasis aštuonkojis, Octopus vulgaris
lv: Astoņkājis, Octopus vulgaris
nl: Gewone octopus, Octopus vulgaris
ru: Осьминог обыкновенный, Octopus vulgaris
sv: Åttaarmade bläckfiskar, Octopus vulgaris
vi: Bạch tuộc thông thường, Octopus vulgaris
zh: 普通章魚, Octopus vulgaris

en: musky octopus, Eledone moschata
ca: pop pudent, Eledone moschata
de: Moschuskrake, Eledone moschata
eu: Musketadun olagarroa, Eledone moschata
fi: myskitursas, Eledone moschata
fr: Élédone musquée, Pieuvre musquée, Eledone moschata
ga: Ochtapas muscach, Eledone moschata
hr: mošusna hobotnica
it: moscardino, Eledone moschata
la: Eledone moschata
nl: Muskus achtarm, Eledone moschata
sl: Moškatna hobotnica, Eledone moschata

en: oyster, oysters
af: Oester
ar: محار
az: Ustritsa
be: Вустрыцы
bn: ঝিনুক
br: Istr
ca: ostra
da: Østers
de: Austern
el: Στρείδι
eo: ostro
es: ostra, ostras
eu: Ostra
fa: صدف خوراکی
fi: osteri, osterit
fr: huître, huitre, huitres
ga: Oisre
gd: Eisir
gl: Ostra
he: אויסטר
hr: kamenica
ht: Zwit
id: Tiram
io: Ostro
is: Ostra
ja: カキ
ko: 굴
la: Ostrea
mr: कालवे
ms: Tiram
my: ကမာ
nb: Østers
nl: oester
nn: Østers
nv: Chʼosh yoołgai bitsʼaʼígíí
oc: Ustra
pt: ostra
ro: Stridie
ru: Устрица, устрицы
sh: Oštriga
sk: ústrice
sl: Ostriga
ta: ஆளி
th: หอยนางรม
tl: Talaba
tr: İstiridye
tt: үстричә
uk: Устриця
vi: Hàu
zh: 牡蠣

en: oyster flavour
de: Austernaroma, Austerngeschmack
es: aroma de ostras
hr: okus kamenica
it: aroma di ostrica

en: pacific oyster, Crassostrea gigas
bg: тихоокеанска чашковидна стрида, Crassostrea gigas
ca: ostra japonesa, Crassostrea gigas
de: Pazifische Felsenauster, Pazifische Auster, Crassostrea gigas
es: ostra del Pacífico, Crassostrea gigas
eu: Ostratzar, Crassostrea gigas
fa: صدف ژاپنی, Crassostrea gigas
fi: tyynenmerenosteri, japaninosteri, Crassostrea gigas
fr: huitre géante du Pacifique, Huître creuse du Pacifique, Crassostrea gigas
gl: Ostra portuguesa, Crassostrea gigas
hr: pacifička kamenica
hu: Csendes-óceáni osztriga, Crassostrea gigas
is: Kyrrahafsostra, Crassostrea gigas
it: ostrica del Pacifico
ja: マガキ, Crassostrea gigas
ko: 참굴, Crassostrea gigas
la: Crassostrea gigas
nb: Stillehavsøsters, Crassostrea gigas
nl: Japanse oester, Crassostrea gigas
nn: Stillehavsøsters, Crassostrea gigas
pl: ostryżyca japońska, Crassostrea gigas
pt: Ostra-do-pacífico, Crassostrea gigas
sv: Japanskt jätteostron, Crassostrea gigas
uk: Гігантська устриця, Crassostrea gigas
zh: 长牡蛎, Crassostrea gigas

en: European oysters
fr: Huîtres plates
it: ostriche europee

en: scallop, scallops
ar: بالیق قولاغی
ca: Pectínid
de: Kammmuscheln, Jakobsmuscheln, Pilgermuscheln
el: Χτένι
es: viera, vieras, escalópas
fa: شانه‌گونان
fi: kampasimpukka, kampasimpukat
fr: noix de saint-jacques, Saint-Jacques, noix de st-jacques, noix de st jacques, noix de coquilles saint-jacques, noix de coquilles st-jacques, coquille Saint-Jacques, coquille st jacques, coquille saint jacques, st-jacques
gl: Pectínidos
hr: jakobova kapica
id: Simping
it: capesante
ja: イタヤガイ科
ky: Деңиз таракчалары
la: Pectinidae
lt: Šukutės
ms: Kekapis
nb: Kamskjell
nv: Chʼosh bitsʼaʼ doolghasígíí
pl: Przegrzebkowate
ru: Морские гребешки, гребешок
sr: Морски чешљеви
sv: Kammusslor
uk: Гребінцеві
zh: 扇贝

en: Scallop without coral
de: Jakobsmuschel ohne Koralle
es: Vieira sin coral
fr: Noix de Saint-Jacques sans corail
hr: jakobova kapica bez koralja
it: Capasanta senza corallo

en: scallop with coral
de: Jakobsmuschel mit Koralle
es: Vieira con coral
fr: Coquilles Saint-Jacques avec noix et corail
hr: jakobova kapica s koraljimaciqual_food_code:en:10003
it: Capasanta con corallo

en: Atlantic bay scallop, bay scallop
de: Jakobsmuscheln der atlantischen Küste
fa: گوش‌ماهی خلیج
fr: Pétoncle, pétoncles
hr: atlantska kapica
is: Flóaskel
it: capesante della baia atlantica
la: Argopecten irradians
zh: 海湾扇贝

en: Atlantic calico scallop
de: Atlantische Kattunmuschels
fr: Pétoncle calicot
hr: atlantic calico scallop
it: capesante di calicò dell'Atlantico
la: Argopecten Gibbus
sr: Ostrea gibba

en: American sea scallop, Canadian sea scallop
fr: Pecten d'Amérique, Peigne du Canada, pétoncle géant, peigne hauturier
hr: američka morska kapica
it: capesante di mare americane
la: Placopecten magellanicus

en: Raw American sea scallop without coral, Raw Canadian sea scallop without coral
fr: Pecten d'Amérique avec noix cru, Peigne du Canada avec noix cru
it: capesante americane crude senza corallo

en: distant scallop, Bractechlamys vexillum
it: capesante distante
la: Bractechlamys vexillum

en: great scallop, king scallop, St James shell, escallop
ar: أسقلوب
br: Krogenn-Sant-Jakez
ca: petxina de pelegrí de l'Atlàntic
da: stor kammusling
de: Große Pilgermuschel
es: Venera
eu: Erromes-maskor handi
fa: گوش‌ماهی شاه
fi: isokampasimpukka
fr: Gros pétoncle
ga: Muirín
gd: Slige-chreachainn
gl: Vieira
hr: velika kapica
io: Petonklo
is: Risadiskur
it: grande capesante
la: Pecten maximus
nl: grote mantel
pl: Przegrzebek zwyczajny
pt: Vieira
sv: Pilgrimsmussla

en: Patagonian scallop
de: Kammmuschel
fi: patagoniankampasimpukka
fr: Pétoncle de Patagonie
hr: patagonijska jakobova kapica
it: capesante della Patagonia
la: Zygochlamys patagonica, Chlamys zygopatagonica

en: noble scallop
de: Feine Kammmuschel
hr: plemenita kapica
it: capasanta nobile
ja: ヒオウギガイ
la: Chlamys nobilis, Mimachlamys nobilis
vi: Sò điệp
zh: 华贵栉孔扇贝

en: Peruvian scallop
de: Peruanische Jakobsmuscheln
es: ostión del norte, concha de abanico
fr: Pétoncle chilien, Pétoncle du Pérou, Peigne du Pérou
hr: peruanska kapica
it: capesante peruviane
la: Argopecten purpuratus

en: Peruvian scallop without coral
fr: Pétoncle du Pérou avec noix, Peigne du Pérou avec noix
it: capesante peruviane senza corallo

en: queen scallop
ca: xelet
de: Kleine Pilgermuschel
es: volandeira
fi: kuningatarkampasimpukka
fr: petit pétoncle, Vanneau, peigne
gl: Volandeira
hr: matična kapica
it: Canestrello
ja: クイーンホタテ
la: Chlamys opercularis, Aequipecten opercularis
nl: Wijde mantel
sr: Ostrea elegans
zh: 女王扇貝